Georgia, session 2025_26, HB564.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Prevention and Plan Act."
SECTION 2.
Part 3 of Article 16 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to health of students, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
H. B. 564
- 1 -

LC 61 0123
"20-2-779.5.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term 'local education agency' shall have the same
meaning as set forth in Code Section 20-2-167.1.
(b) The Department of Education, in consultation with the Department of Behavioral
Health and Developmental Disabilities, the Suicide Prevention Program established
pursuant to Code Section 37-1-27, and mental health experts, shall develop a mental health
crisis plan to rapidly provide mental health services to students experiencing incidents of
violence, threats of violence, natural disasters, or other crisis situations.
(c) By January 1, 2026, the mental health crisis plan shall be made available to all local
education agencies in this state.
(d) The Department of Education, in consultation with the Department of Behavioral
Health and Developmental Disabilities, the Suicide Prevention Program established
pursuant to Code Section 37-1-27, and mental health experts, shall be authorized to develop
promotional materials, training programs, and curricula to be used in training students and
school personnel to recognize and report severe mental illness and to provide such
materials, programs, and curricula to local education agencies.
(e) The Department of Education shall adopt rules and regulations to implement the
provisions of this Code section."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 564
- 2 -